Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 1
LIMITATIONS ON CREDITORS' REMEDIES

5-5-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Uniform Consumer Credit Code - Remedies and Penalties".

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1233, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-5-101, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-5-102. Scope.

This part 1 applies to actions or other proceedings to enforce rights arising from consumer credit transactions.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1233, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-5-102, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-5-103. Restrictions on deficiency judgments in consumer credit sales.

This section applies to a consumer credit sale of goods or services. A consumer is not liable for a deficiency unless the creditor has disposed of the goods in accordance with the provisions on the disposition of collateral of the "Uniform Commercial Code" contained in part 6 of article 9 of title 4, C.R.S.

If the creditor repossesses, with or without the aid of judicial process, or voluntarily accepts surrender of goods that were the subject of the sale and in which the creditor has a security interest, the parties obligated are not personally liable to the creditor for the unpaid balance of the debt arising from the sale of a commercial unit of goods of which the cash sale price was three thousand dollars or less, and the creditor's duty to dispose of the collateral is governed by the provisions on the disposition of collateral of the "Uniform Commercial Code" contained in part 6 of article 9 of title 4, C.R.S.

If the creditor repossesses, with or without the aid of judicial process, or voluntarily accepts surrender of goods that were not the subject of the sale but in which the creditor has a security interest to secure a debt arising from a sale of goods or services or a combined sale of goods and services and the cash price of the sale was three thousand dollars or less, the parties obligated are not personally liable to the creditor for the unpaid balance of the debt arising from the sale, and the creditor's duty to dispose of the collateral is governed by the provisions on disposition of collateral of the "Uniform Commercial Code" contained in part 6 of article 9 of title 4, C.R.S.

For the purpose of determining the unpaid balance of consolidated debts or debts pursuant to revolving credit accounts, the allocation of payments to a debt shall be determined in the same manner as provided for determining the amount of debts secured by various security interests under sections 5-3-202 and 5-3-203.

The consumer may be liable in damages to the creditor if the consumer has misused, abused, or wrongfully damaged the collateral or if, after default and demand in writing, the consumer has wrongfully failed to make the collateral available to the creditor. Nothing in this section shall limit or restrict the remedies of the holders of a security interest for damage to the collateral because of conversion, destruction, or other wrongful acts.

If the creditor elects to bring an action against the consumer for a debt arising from a consumer credit sale of goods or services, when under this section the creditor would not be entitled to a deficiency judgment if the creditor took possession of the collateral, and obtains judgment:

The creditor may not take possession of the collateral; and

The collateral is not subject to levy or sale on execution or similar proceedings pursuant to the judgment.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1233, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1444, § 36, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 1896, § 13, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-5-103, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-5-104. Insecurity and impaired collateral.

If a creditor takes possession of any collateral because the creditor deems himself or herself insecure or because the creditor feels his or her collateral is impaired, and the creditor fails to prove that, at the time possession was taken, the creditor, in good faith, had reasonable cause to believe that he or she was insecure or that his or her collateral was impaired:

The creditor shall be liable to the consumer for court costs and attorney fees as determined by the court; and

The consumer shall not be liable for any finance charge incurred during the period the consumer is without use of the collateral.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1234, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-5-103.5, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-5-105. No garnishment before judgment.

Prior to entry of judgment in an action against the consumer for debt arising from a consumer credit transaction, the creditor may not replevin goods, except motor vehicles, of the consumer with the use of force from a dwelling upon an ex parte order of court or attach unpaid earnings of the consumer by garnishment or like proceedings.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1234, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-5-104, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-5-106. Limitation on garnishment - definitions.

For the purposes of this part 1:

"Disposable earnings" means that part of the earnings of an individual remaining after the deduction from those earnings of amounts required by law to be withheld.

"Garnishment" means any legal or equitable procedure through which the earnings of an individual are required to be withheld for payment of a debt.

The maximum part of the aggregate disposable earnings of an individual for any workweek that is subjected to garnishment to enforce payment of a judgment arising from a consumer credit transaction may not exceed the lesser of:

Twenty-five percent of the individual's disposable earnings for that week; or

The amount by which the individual's disposable earnings for that week exceed thirty times the federal minimum hourly wage prescribed by section 206 (a)(1) of the "Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938", 29 U.S.C. sec. 201 et seq., in effect at the time the earnings are payable; or

The amount by which the individual's disposable earnings for that week exceed thirty times the state minimum hourly wage pursuant to section 15 of article XVIII of the state constitution in effect at the time the earnings are payable.

In the case of earnings for a pay period other than a week, the administrator may prescribe by rule a multiple of the federal minimum hourly wage or the state minimum hourly wage, equivalent in effect to that set forth in subparagraphs (II) or (III) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2).

No court may make, execute, or enforce an order or process in violation of this section.

It shall not be necessary for any individual to claim the exemptions for that portion of the aggregate disposable earnings that are not subject to garnishment as set forth in subsection (2) of this section, and such exemption from garnishment shall be self-executing in any garnishment procedure.

This section does not repeal, alter, or affect other statutes of this state prohibiting garnishments or providing for larger exemptions from garnishments than are allowed under this section.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1234, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(2) amended, p. 878, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-5-105, as it existed prior to 2000.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2007 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 226, Session Laws of Colorado 2007.

5-5-107. No discharge from employment for garnishment.

No employer shall discharge an employee for the reason that a creditor of the employee has subjected or attempted to subject unpaid earnings of the employee to garnishment or like proceedings directed to the employer for the purpose of paying a judgment arising from a consumer credit transaction.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1235, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-5-106, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-5-108. Extortionate extensions of credit.

If it is the understanding of the creditor and the consumer at the time an extension of credit is made that delay in making repayment or failure to make repayment could result in the use of violence or other criminal means to cause harm to the person, reputation, or property of any person, the repayment of the extension of credit is unenforceable through civil judicial processes against the consumer.

If it is shown that an extension of credit was made at an annual percentage rate exceeding forty-five percent calculated according to the actuarial method and that the creditor then had a reputation for the use or threat of use of violence or other criminal means to cause harm to the person, reputation, or property of any person to collect extensions of credit or to punish the nonpayment thereof, there is prima facie evidence that the extension of credit was unenforceable under subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1235, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-5-107, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-5-109. Unconscionability - inducement by unconscionable conduct - unconscionable debt collection.

With respect to a transaction that is, gives rise to, or leads the consumer to believe will give rise to a consumer credit transaction, if the court as a matter of law finds:

The agreement or transaction to have been unconscionable at the time it was made, or to have been induced by unconscionable conduct, the court may refuse to enforce the agreement; or

Any term or part of the agreement or transaction to have been unconscionable at the time it was made, the court may refuse to enforce the agreement, enforce the remainder of the agreement without the unconscionable term or part, or so limit the application of any unconscionable term or part as to avoid any unconscionable result.

With respect to a consumer credit transaction, if the court as a matter of law finds that a person has engaged in, is engaging in, or is likely to engage in unconscionable conduct in collecting a debt arising from that transaction, the court may grant an injunction and award the consumer any actual damages the consumer has sustained.

If it is claimed or appears to the court that the agreement or transaction or any term or part thereof may be unconscionable or that a person has engaged in, is engaging in, or is likely to engage in unconscionable conduct in collecting a debt, the parties shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to the setting, purpose, and effect of the agreement or transaction or term or part thereof or of the conduct to aid the court in making the determination.

In applying subsection (2) of this section, consideration shall be given to each of the following factors, among others, as applicable:

Using or threatening to use force or violence against the consumer or members of the consumer's family;

Communicating with the consumer or a member of the consumer's family at frequent intervals or at unusual hours or under other circumstances so that it is a reasonable inference that the primary purpose of the communication was to harass the consumer;

Using fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading representations such as a communication that simulates legal process or that gives the appearance of being authorized, issued, or approved by a government, governmental agency, or attorney at law when it is not or threatening or attempting to enforce a right with knowledge or reason to know that the right does not exist;

Causing or threatening to cause injury to the consumer's reputation or economic status by:

Disclosing information affecting the consumer's reputation for credit worthiness with knowledge or reason to know that the information is false;

Communicating with the consumer's employer before obtaining a final judgment against the debtor, except, as permitted by statute, to verify the consumer's employment, to ascertain the consumer's whereabouts, or to request that the consumer contact the creditor;

Disclosing to a person, with knowledge or reason to know that the person does not have a legitimate business need for the information, or in any way prohibited by statute, information affecting the consumer's credit or other reputation; or

Disclosing information concerning the existence of a debt known to be disputed by the consumer without disclosing that fact;

Engaging in conduct with knowledge that like conduct has been restrained or enjoined by a court in a civil action by the administrator against any person pursuant to the provisions on injunctions against fraudulent or unconscionable agreements or conduct contained in section 5-6-112.

If, in an action in which unconscionability is claimed, the court finds unconscionability pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the court may award reasonable fees to the attorney for the consumer. If the court does not find unconscionability and the consumer claiming unconscionability has brought or maintained an action the consumer knew to be groundless, the court may award reasonable fees to the attorney for the party against whom the claim is made. In determining attorney fees, the amount of the recovery on behalf of the consumer is not controlling.

The remedies of this section are in addition to remedies otherwise available for the same conduct under laws other than this code, but double recovery of actual damages may not be had.

For the purpose of this section, a charge or practice expressly permitted by this code is not in itself unconscionable.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1236, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-5-108, as it existed prior to 2000.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Fair Debt Collection Practices Act", see article 16 of title 5.

5-5-110. Notice of right to cure.

With respect to a consumer credit transaction, after a consumer has been in default for ten days for failure to make a required payment and has not voluntarily surrendered possession of goods or the mobile home that are collateral, a creditor may give the consumer the notice described in this section. A creditor gives notice to the consumer pursuant to this section when the creditor delivers the notice to the consumer or mails the notice to the consumer at the consumer's residence, as defined in section 5-1-201 (6).

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the notice shall be in writing and conspicuously state: The name, address, and telephone number of the creditor to which payment is to be made, a brief identification of the credit transaction, the right to cure the default, and the amount of payment and date by which payment must be made to cure the default. A notice in substantially the following form complies with this subsection (2):

If the consumer credit transaction is a consumer insurance premium loan, the notice shall conform to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, and a notice in substantially the form specified in subsection (2) of this section shall be deemed compliance with this subsection (3) except for the following:

In lieu of a brief identification of the credit transaction, the notice shall identify the transaction as a consumer insurance premium loan and shall identify each policy or contract that may be canceled;

In lieu of the statement in the form of notice specified in subsection (2) of this section that the creditor may exercise its rights under law, a statement shall be included that each policy or contract identified in the notice may be canceled; and

The last paragraph of the form of notice specified in subsection (2) of this section shall be omitted.

A notice of right to cure delivered or mailed to a cosigner pursuant to this section shall be modified to state that the consumer is late in making his or her payment, include the consumer's name, and that if the amount now due is not paid by the last date for payment, the creditor may exercise its rights against the consumer, cosigner, or both.

(Name, address, and telephone number of creditor)
(Account number, if any)
(Brief identification of credit transaction)

(Date)

is the LAST DATE FOR PAYMENT.

(Amount)

is the AMOUNT NOW DUE.
You are late in making your payment(s). If you pay the AMOUNT NOW DUE (above) by the LAST DAY FOR PAYMENT (above), you may continue with the contract as though you were not late. If you do not pay by this date, we may exercise our rights under the law.
If you are late again in making your payments, we may exercise our rights without sending you another notice like this one. If you have questions, write or telephone the creditor promptly.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1237, § 1, effective July 1.

5-5-111. Cure of default.

With respect to a consumer credit transaction, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, after a default consisting only of the consumer's failure to make a required payment, a creditor, because of that default, may neither accelerate maturity of the unpaid balance of the obligation nor take possession of or otherwise enforce a security interest in the goods or the mobile home that are collateral until twenty days after giving the consumer a notice of right to cure described in section 5-5-110. Until the expiration of the minimum applicable period after the notice is given, all defaults consisting of a failure to make the required payment may be cured by tendering to the creditor the amount of all unpaid sums due at the time of the tender, without acceleration, plus any unpaid delinquency or deferral charges. Cure restores the consumer to his or her rights under the agreement as though the defaults had not occurred.

With respect to defaults on the same obligation, other than defaults on an obligation secured by a mobile home, after a creditor has once given the consumer a notice of right to cure described in section 5-5-110, this section gives no right to cure and imposes no limitation on the creditor's right to proceed against the consumer or goods that are collateral with respect to any subsequent default that occurs within twelve months of such notice. With respect to defaults on the same obligation that is secured by a mobile home, this section gives no right to cure and imposes no limitation on the creditor's right to proceed against the consumer or goods that are collateral with respect to any third default that occurs within twelve months of such notice. For the purpose of this section, in connection with revolving credit accounts, the obligation is the consumer's account, and there is no right to cure and no limitation on the creditor's rights with respect to any default that occurs within twelve months after an earlier default as to which a creditor has given the consumer notice of right to cure.

Unless a creditor has provided the cosignor on a consumer credit transaction with a notice of right to cure that complies with section 5-5-110 and this section, in addition to the notice of right to cure provided to the consumer, the creditor may neither accelerate maturity of the unpaid balance of the obligation as to the cosignor nor report that amount on the cosignor's consumer report with a consumer reporting agency, as defined in section 5-18-103 and 15 U.S.C. sec. 1681a.

This section and the provisions on waiver, agreements to forego rights, and settlement of claims do not prohibit a consumer from voluntarily surrendering possession of goods that are collateral and the creditor from thereafter enforcing its security interest in the goods at any time after default.

This section shall not apply to consumer credit transactions that are payable in four or fewer installments.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1239, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(3) amended, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1170, § 8, effective August 9.

5-5-112. Attorney fees.

With respect to a consumer credit transaction, the agreement may provide for the payment by the consumer of reasonable attorney fees not in excess of fifteen percent of the unpaid debt after default and referral to an attorney not a salaried employee of the creditor or such additional fee as may be directed by the court. A provision in violation of this section is unenforceable.

This section does not authorize the imposition of attorney fees for preparation of a notice of right to cure if the consumer cures the default pursuant to sections 5-5-110 and 5-5-111.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1240, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 5-2-413, 5-3-404, and 5-3-514, as they existed prior to 2000.